District of Columbia statutes.
42-813

Replacement of deceased, appointed trustee.

In case of the death of any trustee appointed as aforesaid without having executed the trusts of the mortgage or deed of trust, a like proceeding to that provided for in § 42-811 may be had to appoint a successor to him in the said trusts.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1273, ch. 854, § 536
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263,§ 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551
1981 Ed., § 45-713.
1973 Ed., § 45-613.
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).